Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-525
State Fire Marshal; records public; exceptions.

All records on file in the State Fire Marshal's office shall be public, except any testimony, correspondence, or other matter taken in an investigation or an inspection by, or in a report to, the State Fire Marshal under the provisions of the Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969 and sections 81-501.01 to 81-531 and 81-5,151 to 81-5,157 which he or she in his or her discretion may withhold from the public.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 24, p. 489;

C.S.1929, § 81-5524;

R.S.1943, § 81-525;

Laws 1969, c. 763, § 12, p. 2892;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 82.

Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969, see section 81-552.